apertium-cv-ru.cv.twol
Alphabet
 а ӑ б в г д е ё ӗ ж з и й к л м н о п р с ҫ т у ӳ ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я 
 А Ӑ Б В Г Д Е Ё Ӗ Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Ҫ Т У Ӳ Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я 

 %>:0 %{A%}:а %{Ă%}:ӑ %{U%}:у %{р%}:р %{ь%}:ь %{н%}:м ; 

Sets

ArchiCns = %{р%} ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь 
      Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь ArchiCns;

FrontVow = и ӳ е э ӗ И Ӳ Е Ӗ Э ;
BackVow = ы у а ӑ Ы У А Ӑ ;
ArchiVow = %{A%} %{Ă%} %{U%} ;
Vow = FrontVow BackVow ArchiVow ;
Segment = FrontVow BackVow ArchiVow Cns ;
NonFront = Cns BackVow ArchiVow %> ;
NonBack =  Cns FrontVow ArchiVow %> ;

Rules

"Front harmony {A} -> е"
%{A%}:е <=> FrontVow: NonBack:* %>: NonBack:* _ ;

"Front harmony {Ă} -> ӗ"
%{Ă%}:ӗ <=> FrontVow: NonBack:* %>: NonBack:* _ ;

"Front harmony {U} -> ӳ"
%{U%}:ӳ <=> FrontVow: NonBack:* %>: NonBack:* _ ;

"Assimilation in locative/ablative"
%{р%}:т <=> [ л | н | р ] %>: _ %{A%}: ; 

! p. 40
"Orthographical ь after back vowel stems"
%{ь%}:0 <=> FrontVow: NonBack:* %>: NonBack:* т _ ;
